District of Columbia statutes.
47-858.02

Tax abatements for homeowners in enterprise zones — Requirements for tax abatement.

In order for a property to be eligible for a tax abatement under § 47-858.03 or § 47-858.04, an owner must:

(1)

Submit an application to the Mayor requesting certification of the property and rehabilitation as eligible for the tax abatement; and

(2)

Receive the Mayor’s certification of the application and the tax abatement.

History

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 701(b), 49 DCR 1468

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-858.03 and § 47-858.04.